Utah statutes.
53B-2-104.   Memberships of board of trustees -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Oath -- Officers -- Bylaws -- Quorum -- Committees -- Compensation.

(1) (a)  The board of trustees of an institution of higher education consists of the following:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection 53B-18-1201(3)(b), eight persons appointed by the governor and approved by the Senate; and

(ii)  two ex officio members who are the president of the institution's alumni association, and the president of the associated students of the institution.

(b)  The appointed members of the boards of trustees for Utah Valley University and Salt Lake Community College shall be representative of the interests of business, industry, and labor.

(2) (a)  The governor shall appoint four members of each board of trustees during each odd-numbered year to four-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment.

(b)  An appointed member holds office until a successor is appointed and qualified.

(c)  The ex officio members serve for the same period as they serve as presidents and until their successors have qualified.

(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4) (a)  Each member shall take the official oath of office prior to assuming the office.

(b)  The oath shall be filed with the Division of Archives and Records Services.

(5)  Each board of trustees shall elect a chair and vice chair, who serve for two years and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(6) (a)  Each board of trustees may enact bylaws for its own government, including provision for regular meetings.

(b) (i)  The board of trustees may provide for an executive committee in its bylaws.

(ii)  If established, the committee shall have full authority of the board of trustees to act upon routine matters during the interim between board of trustees meetings.

(iii)  The committee may act on nonroutine matters only under extraordinary and emergency circumstances.

(iv)  The committee shall report its activities to the board of trustees at its next regular meeting following the action.

(c)  Copies of the board of trustees' bylaws shall be filed with the board.

(7)  A quorum is required to conduct business and consists of six members.

(8)  A board of trustees may establish advisory committees.

(9)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(10)  This section does not apply to the Utah College of Applied Technology.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

